Illinois, session 104th, SB1591.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-710 and by adding Sections 1.125.1 and 611-1433 as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/1.125.1 new)8    Sec. 1.125.1. Leader-follower work zone vehicle. A motor 9vehicle used in combination with another motor vehicle in a 10highway construction or maintenance zone that is:11        (1) equipped with an automated driving system; and12        (2) remotely connected to another motor vehicle 13    allowing for coordinated or controlled movement within 14    line of sight of the operator. 15    (625 ILCS 5/11-710)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-710)16    Sec. 11-710. Following too closely. (a) The driver of a 17motor vehicle shall not follow another vehicle more closely 18than is reasonable and prudent, having due regard for the 19speed of such vehicles and the traffic upon and the condition 20of the highway.21    (b) The driver of any truck or motor vehicle drawing 22another vehicle when traveling upon a roadway outside of a   SB1591- 2 -LRB104 10939 LNS 21021 b1business or residence district and which is following another 2truck or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle shall, whenever 3conditions permit, leave sufficient space so that an 4overtaking vehicle may enter and occupy such space without 5danger, except that this shall not prevent a truck or motor 6vehicle drawing another vehicle from overtaking and passing 7any vehicle or combination of vehicles.8    (c) Motor vehicles being driven upon any roadway outside 9of a business or residence district in a caravan or motorcade 10whether or not towing other vehicles shall be so operated as to 11allow sufficient space between each such vehicle or 12combination of vehicles so as to enable any other vehicle to 13enter and occupy such space without danger. This provision 14shall not apply to funeral processions.15    (d) This Section does not apply to the operation of a 16leader-follower work zone vehicle. 17(Source: P.A. 79-1069.) 18    (625 ILCS 5/11-1433 new)19    Sec. 11-1433. Leader-follower work zone vehicles. The 20Department and the Illinois State Toll Highway Authority are 21authorized and may implement the use of a leader-follower work 22zone vehicle in a highway construction or maintenance zone 23under their jurisdiction to create a safety system to protect 24their workers. The operator of the leader-follower work zone 25vehicle shall be deemed the driver and operator of the motor   SB1591- 3 -LRB104 10939 LNS 21021 b1vehicles being used in the safety system. The leader-follower 2work zone vehicles shall be an authorized vehicle in a highway 3construction or maintenance zone. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.